Illinois, session 104th, SB1468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 30-160 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/30-160)7    Sec. 30-160. Police protection by municipality or county; 8county of 1,000,000 or more; special taxing district. 9    (a) In counties having a population of 1,000,000 or more, 10the electors may authorize the township board to contract with 11one or more municipalities in the township or with the county 12within which the township is located to furnish, using the 13funds levied under subsection (b), police protection in the 14unincorporated area of the township.15    (b) In order to provide and maintain police protection in 16the unincorporated area of the township, the The township 17board may declare the unincorporated area of the township a 18special police district for tax purposes. Proof of the 19declaration authorizes the county clerk to extend a tax upon 20the special police district in the amount specified in the 21annual township tax levy, but not to exceed a rate of .10% of 22the value of taxable property as equalized or assessed by the 23Department of Revenue.  SB1468- 2 -LRB104 06950 RTM 16987 b1    (c) A township board may also use the special police 2district funds levied under subsection (b) to provide for 3public safety in unincorporated areas of the township in the 4manner prescribed by Section 85-13. The funds levied under 5subsection (b) may not be used to pay for (i) any portion of a 6school resource officer's wages or to facilitate any agreement 7with any law enforcement agency to hire a school resource 8officer or (ii) any portion of a red light camera, speed 9camera, or automated license plate reader.10    As used in this subsection:11    "Public safety" includes, but is not limited to, crime 12prevention measures and community safety measures, such as: 13(i) public information campaigns or programs; (ii) traffic 14safety measures, traffic control measures, and signage or 15notices related to those measures; (iii) anti-gang and 16anti-violence community support and intervention programs; and 17(iv) graffiti abatement. 18    "School resource officer" has the meaning given in Section 1910-20.68 of the School Code. 20(Source: P.A. 82-783; 88-62.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.